Illinois, session 104th, HB2787.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended by 5changing Section 8 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 205/8)  (from Ch. 144, par. 188)7    Sec. 8. The Board of Trustees of the University of 8Illinois, the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois 9University, the Board of Trustees of Chicago State University, 10the Board of Trustees of Eastern Illinois University, the 11Board of Trustees of Governors State University, the Board of 12Trustees of Illinois State University, the Board of Trustees 13of Northeastern Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of 14Northern Illinois University, and the Board of Trustees of 15Western Illinois University shall submit to the Board not 16later than the 15th day of November of each year their its 17budget proposals for the operation and capital needs of the 18institutions under their its governance or supervision for the 19ensuing fiscal year. The Illinois Community College Board 20shall submit to the Board by December 15 of each year its 21budget proposal for the operation and capital needs of the 22institutions under its governance or supervision for the 23ensuing fiscal year. Each budget proposal shall conform to the   HB2787 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10482 LNS 20557 b1procedures developed by the Board in the design of an 2information system for State universities and colleges.3    In order to maintain a cohesive system of higher 4education, the Board and its staff shall communicate on a 5regular basis with all public university presidents. They 6shall meet at least semiannually to achieve economies of scale 7where possible and provide the most innovative and efficient 8programs and services.9    The Board, in the analysis of formulating the annual 10budget request, shall consider rates of tuition and fees and 11undergraduate tuition and fee waiver programs at the State 12universities and colleges. The Board shall also consider the 13current and projected utilization of the total physical plant 14of each campus of a university or college in approving the 15capital budget for any new building or facility.16    The Board of Higher Education shall submit to the 17Governor, to the General Assembly, and to the appropriate 18budget agencies of the Governor and General Assembly its 19analysis and recommendations on such budget proposals.20    The Board is directed to form a broad-based group of 21individuals representing the Office of the Governor, the 22General Assembly, public institutions of higher education, 23State agencies, business and industry, statewide organizations 24representing faculty and staff, and others as the Board shall 25deem appropriate to devise a system for allocating State 26resources to public institutions of higher education based   HB2787 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 10482 LNS 20557 b1upon performance in achieving State goals related to student 2success and certificate and degree completion. 3    Beginning in Fiscal Year 2013, the Board of Higher 4Education budget recommendations to the Governor and the 5General Assembly shall include allocations to public 6institutions of higher education based upon performance 7metrics designed to promote and measure student success in 8degree and certificate completion. Public university metrics 9must be adopted by the Board by rule, and public community 10college metrics must be adopted by the Illinois Community 11College Board by rule. These metrics must be developed and 12promulgated in accordance with the following principles:13        (1) The metrics must be developed in consultation with 14    public institutions of higher education, as well as other 15    State educational agencies and other higher education 16    organizations, associations, interests, and stakeholders 17    as deemed appropriate by the Board.18        (2) The metrics shall include provisions for 19    recognizing the demands on and rewarding the performance 20    of institutions in advancing the success of students who 21    are academically or financially at risk, including 22    first-generation students, low-income students, and 23    students traditionally underrepresented in higher 24    education, as specified in Section 9.16 of this Act.25        (3) The metrics shall recognize and account for the 26    differentiated missions of institutions and sectors of   HB2787 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 10482 LNS 20557 b1    higher education.2        (4) The metrics shall focus on the fundamental goal of 3    increasing completion of college courses, certificates, 4    and degrees. Performance metrics shall recognize the 5    unique and broad mission of public community colleges 6    through consideration of additional factors, including, 7    but not limited to, enrollment, progress through key 8    academic milestones, transfer to a baccalaureate 9    institution, and degree completion.10        (5) The metrics must be designed to maintain the 11    quality of degrees, certificates, courses, and programs.12In devising performance metrics, the Board may be guided by 13the report of the Higher Education Finance Study Commission. 14    Each State university must submit its plan for capital 15improvements of non-instructional facilities to the Board for 16approval before final commitments are made if the total cost 17of the project as approved by the institution's board of 18control is in excess of $2 million. Non-instructional uses 19shall include but not be limited to dormitories, union 20buildings, field houses, stadium, other recreational 21facilities and parking lots. The Board shall determine whether 22or not any project submitted for approval is consistent with 23the strategic plan for higher education and with instructional 24buildings that are provided for therein. If the project is 25found by a majority of the Board not to be consistent, such 26capital improvement shall not be constructed.  HB2787 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 10482 LNS 20557 b1(Source: P.A. 102-1046, eff. 6-7-22; 103-940, eff. 8-9-24; 2revised 8-23-24.)